src/third-party/hunspell-dictionaries/pt-BR.aff
SFX w   0        bramir       bramir
SFX w   0        a            bramir
SFX w   0                     bramir
SFX w   0        am           bramir
SFX w   ir        ramos       bramir
SFX w   0         o           bramir
SFX w   0        as           bramir
SFX w   0         s           bramir
SFX w   0        des          bramir
SFX w   0        ei           bramir
SFX w   0        eis          bramir
SFX w   ir        reis        bramir
SFX w   0        em           bramir
SFX w   0        emos         bramir
SFX w   0        es           bramir
SFX w   0        ia           bramir
SFX w   0        iam          bramir
SFX w   0         amos        bramir
SFX w   0        ias          bramir
SFX w   0         eis         bramir
SFX w   0        mos          bramir
SFX w   r        s            bramir
SFX w   r        sse          bramir
SFX w   ir        sseis       bramir
SFX w   r        ssem         bramir
SFX w   ir        ssemos      bramir
SFX w   r        sses         bramir
SFX w   r        ste          bramir
SFX w   r        stes         bramir
SFX w   r        u            bramir
SFX w   r        0            bramir
